New Mexico, session 2026, SB77.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF NEW MEXICO: SECTION 1. Section 13-4D-4 NMSA 1978 (being Laws 1992, Chapter 74, Section 4, as amended) is amended to read: "13-4D-4. ADMINISTRATION.-- A. The Public Works Apprentice and Training Act shall be administered by the workforce solutions department. The department shall collect employers' contributions in accordance with that act, review employers' compliance statements, review certified payroll reports to verify training contributions, investigate allegations of and impose penalties for employer noncompliance and disburse funds as provided in Section 13-4D-5 NMSA 1978. B. Public works construction projects, except [for street, highway, bridge, road, utility or maintenance contracts with employers who elect not to participate in training] as provided in Subsection C of this section, shall not be constructed unless an employer agrees to make contributions to approved apprentice and training programs in New Mexico in which the employer is a participant or to the public works apprentice and training fund administered by the workforce solutions department. Contributions shall be made in the same manner and in the same amount as apprentice and training contributions required pursuant to wage rate determinations made by the department. C. The provisions of Subsection B of this section shall not apply to public works construction projects involving a craft or trade that is not recognized as apprenticeable by the office of apprenticeship of the employment and training administration of the United States department of labor or the apprenticeship council. [C.] D. The workforce solutions department shall adopt rules and regulations necessary to implement the provisions of the Public Works Apprentice and Training Act." SECTION 2. EFFECTIVE DATE.--The effective date of the provisions of this act is July 1, 2026.